Utah statutes.
65A-8-212.   Power of state forester to close hazardous areas -- Violations
of an order closing an area.
(1) (a)  If the state forester finds conditions in a given area in the state
to be extremely hazardous, he shall close those areas to any forms of use by
the public, or to limit that use.
(b)  The closure shall include the prohibition of open fires for the period of
time he finds necessary.
(2)  Nothing in this chapter prohibits any resident within the area from full
and free access to his home or property, or any legitimate use by the owner or
lessee of the property.
(3)  The order or proclamation closing or limiting the use in the area shall
set forth:
(a)  the exact area coming under the order;
(b)  the date when the order becomes effective; and
(c)  if advisable, the authority from whom permits for entry into the area may
be obtained.
(4)  Any entry into or use of any area in violation of this section is a class
B misdemeanor.
